Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-606.01
License, defined.

License shall mean a license issued to any county, city, or village to conduct a lottery for community betterment purposes, any license issued to any lottery operator, any license issued to any manufacturer-distributor, any license issued to any authorized sales outlet location, and any license issued to any lottery worker.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 52;

Laws 1993, LB 563, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 50.